Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1347
Saving clause.

The Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act does not prevent the recognition under principles of comity or otherwise of a foreign-country judgment not within the scope of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 11.